Maryland, session 2025, SB0859.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – General
7–309.
(a) Notwithstanding an Act of Congress that repeals or reduces the federal credit
under § 2011 of the Internal Revenue Code, the provisions of this subtitle in effect before
the passage of the Act of Congress shall apply with respect to a decedent who dies after the
effective date of the Act of Congress so as to continue the Maryland estate tax in force

SENATE BILL 859 3
without reduction in the same manner as if the federal credit had not been repealed or
reduced.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) through (9) of this subsection and
subsection (c) of this section, after the effective date of an Act of Congress described in
subsection (a) of this section, the Maryland estate tax shall be determined using:
(i) the federal credit allowable by § 2011 of the Internal Revenue
Code as in effect before the reduction or repeal of the federal credit pursuant to the Act of
Congress; and
(ii) other provisions of federal estate tax law as in effect on the date
of the decedent’s death.
(2) Except as provided in paragraphs (3) through (9) of this subsection and
subsection (c) of this section, if the federal estate tax is not in effect on the date of the
decedent’s death, the Maryland estate tax shall be determined using:
(i) the federal credit allowable by § 2011 of the Internal Revenue
Code as in effect before the reduction or repeal of the federal credit pursuant to the Act of
Congress; and
(ii) other provisions of federal estate tax law as in effect on the date
immediately preceding the effective date of the repeal of the federal estate tax.
(3) (i) Notwithstanding any increase in the unified credit allowed
against the federal estate tax for decedents dying after 2003, the unified credit used for
determining the Maryland estate tax for a decedent may not exceed the applicable credit
amount corresponding to an applicable exclusion amount, within the meaning of § 2010(c)
of the Internal Revenue Code, of:
1. $1,000,000 for a decedent dying before January 1, 2015;
2. $1,500,000 for a decedent dying on or after January 1,
2015, but before January 1, 2016;
3. $2,000,000 for a decedent dying on or after January 1,
2016, but before January 1, 2017;
4. $3,000,000 for a decedent dying on or after January 1,
2017, but before January 1, 2018;
5. $4,000,000 for a decedent dying on or after January 1,
2018, but before January 1, 2019; [and]
6. $5,000,000 for a decedent dying on or after January 1,
2019, BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, plus any deceased spousal unused exclusion

SENATE BILL 859
amount calculated in accordance with paragraph (9) of this subsection; AND
7. $2,000,000 FOR A DECEDENT DYING ON OR AFTER
JANUARY 1, 2026, PLUS ANY DECEASED SPOUSAL UNUSED EXCLUSION AMOUNT
CALCULATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (9) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(ii) The Maryland estate tax shall be determined without regard to
any deduction for State death taxes allowed under § 2058 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(iii) Unless the federal credit allowable by § 2011 of the Internal
Revenue Code is in effect on the date of the decedent’s death, the federal credit used to
determine the Maryland estate tax may not exceed 16% of the amount by which the
decedent’s taxable estate, as defined in § 2051 of the Internal Revenue Code, exceeds:
1. $1,000,000 for a decedent dying before January 1, 2015;
2. $1,500,000 for a decedent dying on or after January 1,
2015, but before January 1, 2016;
3. $2,000,000 for a decedent dying on or after January 1,
2016, but before January 1, 2017;
4. $3,000,000 for a decedent dying on or after January 1,
2017, but before January 1, 2018;
5. $4,000,000 for a decedent dying on or after January 1,
2018, but before January 1, 2019; [and]
6. $5,000,000 for a decedent dying on or after January 1,
2019, BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2026, plus any deceased spousal unused exclusion
amount calculated in accordance with paragraph (9) of this subsection; AND
7. $2,000,000 FOR A DECEDENT DYING ON OR AFTER
JANUARY 1, 2026, PLUS ANY DECEASED SPOUSAL UNUSED EXCLUSION AMOUNT
CALCULATED IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (9) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(9) (i) In this paragraph, “deceased spousal unused exclusion amount”
means the applicable exclusion amount in effect at the time of the death of the last
predeceased spouse of the decedent under paragraph (3) of this subsection reduced by the
taxable estate of the last predeceased spouse:
1. as reported on a Maryland estate tax return filed with the
Comptroller; or
2. as reported on a federal estate tax return, if:

SENATE BILL 859 5
A. the last predeceased spouse was not a Maryland resident
and no property with a Maryland estate tax situs was includible in the gross estate of the
last predeceased spouse; or
B. the last predeceased spouse died before January 1, 2019,
and no Maryland estate tax return was required to be filed with respect to the predeceased
spouse’s estate.
(ii) The deceased spousal unused exclusion amount may not be taken
into account under paragraph (3) of this subsection unless:
1. if the last predeceased spouse died on or after January 1,
2019, a Maryland estate tax return is timely filed for the last predeceased spouse, on which
the deceased spousal unused exclusion amount is calculated and an irrevocable election is
made that the deceased spousal unused exclusion amount may be taken into account; or
2. if the last predeceased spouse died before January 1, 2019,
or was not a Maryland resident and no property with a Maryland estate tax situs was
includible in the gross estate of the last predeceased spouse, an election was made under §
2010(c) of the Internal Revenue Code on the federal estate tax return of the last
predeceased spouse.
(iii) 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the
Comptroller may examine a Maryland estate tax return of a predeceased spouse after the
time for assessing a tax under this title has expired under § 13–1101 of this article solely
for the purposes of determining the validity of the deceased spousal unused exclusion
election and the amount to be taken into account under paragraph (3) of this subsection.
2. This subparagraph may not be construed to authorize the
assessment of any additional tax with respect to the predeceased spouse’s Maryland estate
tax return if the period of limitation under § 13–1101 of this article has expired.
10–108.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section and unless expressly
provided otherwise by law, an amendment of the Internal Revenue Code that affects the
determination of federal adjusted gross income or federal taxable income, does not affect
the determination of Maryland taxable income under this title for:
(1) any taxable year that begins in the calendar year in which the
amendment is enacted; [or]
(2) THE TAXABLE YEAR THAT BEGINS IN THE CALENDAR YEAR THAT
IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWS THE CALENDAR YEAR IN WHICH THE AMENDMENT IS
ENACTED; OR

SENATE BILL 859
[(2)] (3) any taxable year that precedes the calendar year in which the
amendment is enacted.
(c) Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to an amendment of the Internal
Revenue Code if the Comptroller determines that the impact of the amendment on State
income tax revenue is less than $5,000,000 for:
(1) the fiscal year that begins during the calendar year in which the
amendment is enacted; [or]
(2) THE FISCAL YEAR THAT BEGINS DURING THE CALENDAR YEAR
IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING THE CALENDAR YEAR IN WHICH THE AMENDMENT IS
ENACTED; OR
[(2)] (3) any fiscal year that precedes the calendar year in which the
amendment is enacted.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–751.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Qualified child” means a dependent of a taxpayer, if the dependent:
(i) is a dependent for purposes of § 152 of the Internal Revenue Code
IN EFFECT ON DECEMBER 31, 2024; and
(ii) 1. is under the age of 6 years; or
2. A. is under the age of 17 years; and
B. is a child with a disability, as defined under § 8–401 of the
Education Article.
(3) “Taxpayer” means:
(i) an individual filing an income tax return; or
(ii) a married couple filing a joint income tax return.

SENATE BILL 859 7
(b) A taxpayer who is a resident and has federal adjusted gross income for the
taxable year of $15,000 or less may claim a credit against the State income tax for each
qualified child in an amount equal to $500.
(c) If the credit allowed under this section in any taxable year exceeds the State
income tax for that taxable year, the taxpayer may claim a refund in the amount of the
excess.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–102.2.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “PASS–THROUGH ENTITY” AND “PASS–THROUGH
ENTITY’S TAXABLE INCOME” HAVE THE MEANINGS STATED IN § 10–102.1 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
(B) IN ADDITION TO THE STATE INCOME TAX IMPOSED UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE, FOR A TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31, 2026, BUT
BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2033, EACH CORPORATION AND PASS–THROUGH ENTITY SHALL
PAY A BUSINESS TRANSPORTATION FEE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(C) THE BUSINESS TRANSPORTATION FEE IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION
SHALL EQUAL 2.5% OF THE AMOUNT OF THE CORPORATION’S MARYLAND TAXABLE
INCOME OR PASS–THROUGH ENTITY’S TAXABLE INCOME THAT EXCEEDS
$10,000,000.
(D) RETURNS AND PAYMENTS OF THE BUSINESS TRANSPORTATION FEE
SHALL BE DUE AND PAYABLE IN THE SAME MANNER AS RETURNS AND PAYMENTS OF
THE STATE INCOME TAX UNDER SUBTITLES 8 AND 9 OF THIS TITLE.
(E) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A TAXPAYER MAY
NOT CLAIM ANY CREDIT AGAINST THE BUSINESS TRANSPORTATION FEE IMPOSED
UNDER THIS SECTION EXCEPT FOR CREDITS FOR INSTALLMENT PAYMENTS,
ESTIMATED PAYMENTS MADE WITH A REQUEST FOR AN EXTENSION OF TIME FOR
FILING A RETURN, OR OVERPAYMENTS FROM PRIOR PERIODS.
(F) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE REVENUE FROM THE BUSINESS
TRANSPORTATION FEE IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION TO THE TRANSPORTATION
TRUST FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 3–216 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE.
(G) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS

SENATE BILL 859
SECTION.
10–104.
The income tax does not apply to the income of:
(5) except as provided in [§ 10–102.1] §§ 10–102.1 AND 10–102.2 of this
subtitle, a partnership, as defined in § 761 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(6) except as provided in [§ 10–102.1] §§ 10–102.1 AND 10–102.2 of this
subtitle and § 10–304(3) of this title, an S corporation;
(8) except as provided in [§ 10–102.1] §§ 10–102.1 AND 10–102.2 of this
subtitle, a limited liability company as defined under Title 4A of the Corporations and
Associations Article to the extent that the company is taxable as a partnership, as defined
in § 761 of the Internal Revenue Code.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–210.1.
(b) In addition to the modifications under §§ 10–204 through 10–210 of this
subtitle, to determine Maryland adjusted gross income of an individual:
(2) an amount is added to or subtracted from federal adjusted gross income
to determine the net operating loss deduction allowed under § 172 of the Internal Revenue
Code without regard to an election under § 172(b)(1)(H) of the Internal Revenue Code for a
carryback period of up to 5 years, PROVIDED THAT ONLY THE FIRST $500,000 OF NET
OPERATING LOSSES MAY BE ALLOWED FOR A TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER
DECEMBER 31, 2026, BUT BEFORE JANUARY 1, 2032;
10–310.
In addition to the modifications under §§ 10–305 through 10–309 of this subtitle, to
determine Maryland modified income the federal taxable income of a corporation shall be
adjusted as provided for an individual under § 10–210.1 of this title.
10–402.
(d) (1) (i) In this paragraph:
1. “manufacturing corporation” means a domestic or foreign
corporation which is primarily engaged in activities that, in accordance with the North

SENATE BILL 859 9
American Industrial Classification System (NAICS), United States Manual, United States
Office of Management and Budget, 1997 Edition, would be included in Sector 11, 31, 32, or
33; and
2. “manufacturing corporation” does not include a refiner, as
defined in § 10–101 of the Business Regulation Article.
(ii) If a manufacturing corporation carries on its trade or business
within and outside the State and the trade or business is a unitary business, the part of the
corporation’s Maryland modified income derived from or reasonably attributable to trade
or business carried on in the State shall be determined using a single sales factor
apportionment formula, by multiplying its Maryland modified income by 100% of the sales
factor.
(iii) In filing its tax return for each year, a manufacturing corporation
shall certify that the NAICS Code reported on its Maryland return is consistent with that
reported to other government agencies.
(iv) If the Comptroller determines that a corporation has submitted
information that incorrectly classifies the corporation as a manufacturing corporation
under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the Comptroller shall reclassify the corporation
in an appropriate manner.
(2) Except as provided in paragraphs (1) and (3) of this subsection:
(i) for a taxable year beginning after December 31, 2017, but before
January 1, 2019, if the trade or business is a unitary business, the part of the corporation’s
Maryland modified income derived from or reasonably attributable to trade or business
carried on in the State shall be determined using a 3–factor apportionment fraction:
1. the numerator of which is the sum of the property factor,
the payroll factor, and 3 times the sales factor; and
2. the denominator of which is 5;
(ii) for a taxable year beginning after December 31, 2018, but before
January 1, 2020, if the trade or business is a unitary business, the part of the corporation’s
Maryland modified income derived from or reasonably attributable to trade or business
carried on in the State shall be determined using a 3–factor apportionment fraction:
1. the numerator of which is the sum of the property factor,
the payroll factor, and 4 times the sales factor; and
2. the denominator of which is 6;
(iii) for a taxable year beginning after December 31, 2019, but before
January 1, 2021, if the trade or business is a unitary business, the part of the corporation’s

SENATE BILL 859
Maryland modified income derived from or reasonably attributable to trade or business
carried on in the State shall be determined using a 3–factor apportionment fraction:
1. the numerator of which is the sum of the property factor,
the payroll factor, and 5 times the sales factor; and
2. the denominator of which is 7;
(iv) for a taxable year beginning after December 31, 2020, but before
January 1, 2022, if the trade or business is a unitary business, the part of the corporation’s
Maryland modified income derived from or reasonably attributable to trade or business
carried on in the State shall be determined using a 3–factor apportionment fraction:
1. the numerator of which is the sum of the property factor,
the payroll factor, and 6 times the sales factor; and
2. the denominator of which is 8; and
(v) for a taxable year beginning after December 31, 2021, if the trade
or business is a unitary business, the part of the corporation’s Maryland modified income
derived from or reasonably attributable to trade or business carried on in the State shall
be determined using a single sales factor apportionment formula, by multiplying its
Maryland modified income by 100% of the sales factor.
(3) (i) Each year a worldwide headquartered company that filed a
federal corporate income tax return for the taxable year may elect to calculate its Maryland
modified income derived from or reasonably attributable to trade or business carried on in
the State using a 3–factor apportionment fraction:
1. the numerator of which is the sum of the property factor,
the payroll factor, and twice the sales factor; and
2. the denominator of which is 4.
(ii) To determine under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph the
Maryland modified income of a corporation or group of corporations that is a worldwide
headquartered company that filed a federal corporate income tax return for the taxable
year, gross income from intangible investments, including dividends, interest, royalties,
and capital gains from the sale of intangible property, shall be included in the calculation
of the numerator based on the average of the property and payroll factors.
(4) The property factor under paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection shall
include:
(i) rented and owned real property; and
(ii) tangible personal property located in the State and used in the

SENATE BILL 859 11
trade or business.
(5) (I) FOR A TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31,
2026, SALES OF TANGIBLE PERSONAL PROPERTY SHALL BE INCLUDED IN THE
NUMERATOR OF THE SALES FACTOR UNDER PARAGRAPH (1), (2), OR (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION IF:
1. THE PROPERTY IS DELIVERED OR SHIPPED TO A
PURCHASER WITHIN THE STATE, REGARDLESS OF THE FREE ON BOARD (F.O.B.)
POINT OR OTHER CONDITIONS OF THE SALE; OR
2. THE PROPERTY IS SHIPPED FROM AN OFFICE, A
STORE, A WAREHOUSE, A FACTORY, OR ANY OTHER PLACE OF STORAGE IN THE
STATE AND THE CORPORATION IS NOT TAXABLE IN THE STATE OF THE PURCHASER.
(II) FOR PURPOSES OF SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, A CORPORATION IS TAXABLE IN A STATE IF:
1. IN THAT STATE THE CORPORATION IS SUBJECT TO A
NET INCOME TAX, FRANCHISE TAX MEASURED BY NET INCOME, FRANCHISE TAX FOR
THE PRIVILEGE OF DOING BUSINESS, OR CORPORATE STOCK TAX; OR
2. THAT STATE HAS JURISDICTION TO SUBJECT THE
TAXPAYER TO A NET INCOME TAX, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER, IN FACT, THE STATE
IMPOSES A TAX.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–102.3.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “MEMBER” MEANS:
(I) A SHAREHOLDER OF AN S CORPORATION;
(II) A GENERAL OR LIMITED PARTNER OF A PARTNERSHIP,
LIMITED PARTNERSHIP, OR LIMITED LIABILITY PARTNERSHIP;
(III) A MEMBER OF A LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY; OR

SENATE BILL 859
(IV) A BENEFICIARY OF A BUSINESS TRUST OR STATUTORY
TRUST.
(3) “PASS–THROUGH ENTITY” MEANS:
(I) AN S CORPORATION;
(II) A PARTNERSHIP;
(III) A LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY THAT IS NOT TAXED AS A
CORPORATION UNDER THIS TITLE; OR
(IV) A BUSINESS TRUST OR STATUTORY TRUST THAT IS NOT
TAXED AS A CORPORATION UNDER THIS TITLE.
(B) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO THE INCOME OF A PASS–THROUGH
ENTITY THAT IS A SOLE PROPRIETORSHIP.
(C) (1) IN ADDITION TO ANY OTHER TAX IMPOSED UNDER THIS TITLE, A
TAX IS IMPOSED ON THE DISTRIBUTIVE SHARE OR PRO RATA SHARE OF INCOME
DISTRIBUTED TO A MEMBER OF A PASS–THROUGH ENTITY FROM THE
PASS–THROUGH ENTITY’S TAXABLE INCOME THAT EXCEEDS $1,000,000.
(2) THE RATE OF THE TAX IMPOSED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION IS 8.25%.
10–104.
The income tax does not apply to the income of:
(5) except as provided in §§ 10–102.1 [and], 10–102.2, AND 10–102.3 of
this subtitle, a partnership, as defined in § 761 of the Internal Revenue Code;
(6) except as provided in §§ 10–102.1 [and], 10–102.2, AND 10–102.3 of
this subtitle and § 10–304(3) of this title, an S corporation;
(8) except as provided in §§ 10–102.1 [and], 10–102.2, AND 10–102.3 of
this subtitle, a limited liability company as defined under Title 4A of the Corporations and
Associations Article to the extent that the company is taxable as a partnership, as defined
in § 761 of the Internal Revenue Code.
10–105.
(a) (1) For an individual other than an individual described in paragraph (2)

SENATE BILL 859 13
of this subsection, the State income tax rate is:
(I) WITH RESPECT TO TAXPAYERS WHOSE MARYLAND TAXABLE
INCOME DOES NOT EXCEED $250,001:
[(i)] 1. 2% of Maryland taxable income of $1 through $1,000;
[(ii)] 2. 3% of Maryland taxable income of $1,001 through $2,000;
[(iii)] 3. 4% of Maryland taxable income of $2,001 through $3,000;
[(iv)] 4. 4.75% of Maryland taxable income of $3,001 through
$100,000;
[(v)] 5. 5% of Maryland taxable income of $100,001 through
$125,000;
[(vi)] 6. 5.25% of Maryland taxable income of $125,001 through
$150,000; AND
[(vii)] 7. 5.5% of Maryland taxable income of $150,001 through
$250,000; [and]
[(viii)] (II) [5.75%] WITH RESPECT TO TAXPAYERS WHOSE
MARYLAND TAXABLE INCOME IS AT LEAST $250,001 BUT DOES NOT EXCEED
$500,000, 6% of Maryland taxable income [in excess of $250,000];
(III) WITH RESPECT TO TAXPAYERS WHOSE MARYLAND TAXABLE
INCOME IS AT LEAST $500,001 BUT DOES NOT EXCEED $1,000,000, 6.5% OF
MARYLAND TAXABLE INCOME; AND
(IV) WITH RESPECT TO TAXPAYERS WHOSE MARYLAND TAXABLE
INCOME IS AT LEAST $1,000,001, 7% OF MARYLAND TAXABLE INCOME.
(2) For spouses filing a joint return or for a surviving spouse or head of
household as defined in § 2 of the Internal Revenue Code, the State income tax rate is:
(I) WITH RESPECT TO TAXPAYERS WHOSE MARYLAND TAXABLE
INCOME DOES NOT EXCEED $300,001:
[(i)] 1. 2% of Maryland taxable income of $1 through $1,000;
[(ii)] 2. 3% of Maryland taxable income of $1,001 through $2,000;
[(iii)] 3. 4% of Maryland taxable income of $2,001 through $3,000;

SENATE BILL 859
[(iv)] 4. 4.75% of Maryland taxable income of $3,001 through
$150,000;
[(v)] 5. 5% of Maryland taxable income of $150,001 through
$175,000;
[(vi)] 6. 5.25% of Maryland taxable income of $175,001 through
$225,000; AND
[(vii)] 7. 5.5% of Maryland taxable income of $225,001 through
$300,000; [and]
[(viii)] (II) [5.75%] WITH RESPECT TO TAXPAYERS WHOSE
MARYLAND TAXABLE INCOME IS AT LEAST $300,001 BUT DOES NOT EXCEED
$600,000, 6% of Maryland taxable income [in excess of $300,000];
(III) WITH RESPECT TO TAXPAYERS WHOSE MARYLAND TAXABLE
INCOME IS AT LEAST $600,001 BUT DOES NOT EXCEED $1,200,000, 6.5% OF
MARYLAND TAXABLE INCOME; AND
(IV) WITH RESPECT TO TAXPAYERS WHOSE MARYLAND TAXABLE
INCOME IS AT LEAST $1,200,001, 7% OF MARYLAND TAXABLE INCOME.
(3) (I) IN THIS PARAGRAPH, “NET INVESTMENT INCOME” HAS THE
MEANING STATED UNDER § 1411(C) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE, EXCLUDING
THE NET GAIN ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE DISPOSITION OF PARCELS OF PROPERTY, OR
PORTIONS THEREOF, THAT ARE AGRICULTURAL LAND AND BUILDINGS.
(II) IN ADDITION TO THE TAX CALCULATED UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OR (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, FOR AN INDIVIDUAL WITH FEDERAL ADJUSTED
GROSS INCOME IN EXCESS OF $350,000, A TAX IS IMPOSED ON THE NET INVESTMENT
INCOME OF THE INDIVIDUAL AT A RATE OF 1%.
(III) FOR AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS NOT A RESIDENT OF THE STATE
FOR THE ENTIRE TAXABLE YEAR, THE TAX UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE
CALCULATED AS IF THE INDIVIDUAL IS A RESIDENT OF THE STATE, MULTIPLIED BY
A FRACTION IN WHICH:
1. THE NUMERATOR IS NET INVESTMENT INCOME
ALLOCABLE TO THE STATE; AND
2. THE DENOMINATOR IS THE TOTAL OF NET
INVESTMENT INCOME FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR.

SENATE BILL 859 15
10–704.
(a) In this section, “taxpayer” means:
(1) an individual filing an income tax return; or
(2) a married couple filing a joint income tax return.
(b) (1) A resident who is a taxpayer may claim a credit against the State
income tax for a taxable year in the amount determined under subsection (c) of this section
for earned income.
(2) A resident who is a taxpayer may claim a credit against the county
income tax for a taxable year in the amount determined under subsection (d) of this section
for earned income.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection and
subject to subsection (e) of this section, the credit allowed against the State income tax
under subsection (b)(1) of this section is the lesser of:
(i) 50% of the earned income credit allowable for the taxable year
under § 32 of the Internal Revenue Code or that would have been allowable but for the
limitation under § 32(m) of the Internal Revenue Code; or
(ii) the State income tax for the taxable year.
(2) (i) Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph and subsection (e)
of this section, a resident may claim a refund in the amount, if any, by which the applicable
percentage specified in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph of the earned income credit
allowable for the taxable year under § 32 of the Internal Revenue Code exceeds the State
income tax for the taxable year.
(ii) Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, the applicable
percentage of the earned income credit allowable under § 32 of the Internal Revenue Code
to be used for purposes of determining the refund provided under this paragraph is:
1. 25% for a taxable year beginning after December 31, 2013,
but before January 1, 2015;
2. 25.5% for a taxable year beginning after December 31,
2014, but before January 1, 2016;
3. 26% for a taxable year beginning after December 31, 2015,
but before January 1, 2017;

SENATE BILL 859
4. 27% for a taxable year beginning after December 31, 2016,
but before January 1, 2018;
5. 28% for a taxable year beginning after December 31, 2017,
but before January 1, 2020; and
6. 45% for a taxable year beginning after December 31, 2019.
(iii) For purposes of determining the refund provided under this
paragraph, the earned income credit allowable under § 32 of the Internal Revenue Code is
calculated without regard to the limitation under § 32(m) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(3) (i) For purposes of this section for an individual without a qualifying
child, the credit allowable for a taxable year under § 32 of the Internal Revenue Code is
calculated without regard to:
1. the minimum age requirement under § 32(c)(1)(A)(ii)(II) of
the Internal Revenue Code; or
2. the limitation under § 32(m) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(ii) [Subject to subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph, the] THE credit
allowed against the State income tax under subsection (b)(1) of this section for an individual
without a qualifying child is:
1. equal to 100% of the earned income credit allowable for a
taxable year under § 32 of the Internal Revenue Code; AND
2. CALCULATED BY SUBSTITUTING:
A. $7,840 FOR THE EARNED INCOME AMOUNT IN §
32(B)(2)(A) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE; AND
B. $19,160 FOR THE PHASE–OUT AMOUNT IN §
32(B)(2)(A) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
[(iii) For a taxable year beginning after December 31, 2019, but before
January 1, 2023, the tax credit allowed under this paragraph may not exceed $530 for a
taxable year.]
(III) 1. FOR EACH TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER
DECEMBER 31, 2028, THE EARNED INCOME AMOUNT AND PHASE–OUT AMOUNT IN
SUBPARAGRAPH (II)2 OF THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL BE INCREASED BY AN AMOUNT
EQUAL TO THE PRODUCT OF MULTIPLYING EACH AMOUNT BY THE COST–OF–LIVING
ADJUSTMENT SPECIFIED IN SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH.

SENATE BILL 859 17
2. FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH, THE
COST–OF–LIVING ADJUSTMENT IS THE COST–OF–LIVING ADJUSTMENT WITHIN THE
MEANING OF § 1(F)(3) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE FOR THE CALENDAR YEAR
IN WHICH THE TAXABLE YEAR BEGINS, AS DETERMINED BY THE COMPTROLLER BY
SUBSTITUTING “CALENDAR YEAR 2022” FOR “CALENDAR YEAR 2016” IN § 1(F)(3)(A)
OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
3. IF ANY INCREASE DETERMINED UNDER
SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 1 OF THIS SUBPARAGRAPH IS NOT A MULTIPLE OF $10, THE
INCREASE SHALL BE ROUNDED DOWN TO THE NEXT LOWEST MULTIPLE OF $10.
(iv) If the tax credit allowed under this paragraph in any taxable year
exceeds the total tax otherwise payable by the individual without a qualifying child for that
taxable year, the individual may claim a refund in the amount of the excess.
(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection and subject to
subsection (e) of this section, the credit allowed against the county income tax under
subsection (b)(2) of this section is the lesser of:
(i) the earned income credit allowable for the taxable year under §
32 of the Internal Revenue Code or that would have been allowable but for the limitation
under § 32(m) of the Internal Revenue Code multiplied by 10 times the county income tax
rate for the taxable year; or
(ii) the county income tax for the taxable year.
(2) (i) A county may provide, by law, for a refundable county earned
income credit as provided in this paragraph.
(ii) If a county provides for a refundable county earned income credit
under this paragraph, on or before July 1 prior to the beginning of the first taxable year for
which it is applicable, the county shall give the Comptroller notice of the refundable county
earned income credit.
(iii) If a county provides for a refundable county earned income credit
under this paragraph, a resident may claim a refund of the amount, if any, by which the
product of multiplying the credit allowable for the taxable year under § 32 of the Internal
Revenue Code or that would have been allowable but for the limitation under § 32(m) of
the Internal Revenue Code by 5 times the county income tax rate for the taxable year
exceeds the county income tax for the taxable year.
(iv) The amount of any refunds payable under a refundable county
earned income credit operates to reduce the income tax revenue from individuals
attributable to the county income tax for that county.

SENATE BILL 859
(e) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, for an individual who is a
resident of the State for only a part of the year, the amount of the credit or refund allowed
under this section shall be determined based on the part of the earned income credit
allowable for the taxable year under § 32 of the Internal Revenue Code that is attributable
to Maryland, determined by multiplying the federal earned income credit by a fraction:
(i) the numerator of which is the Maryland adjusted gross income of
the individual; and
(ii) the denominator of which is the federal adjusted gross income of
the individual.
(2) For purposes of determining the amount of the credit or refund under
paragraph (1) of this subsection, the part of the earned income credit allowable for the
taxable year under § 32 of the Internal Revenue Code is calculated without regard to the
limitation under § 32(m) of the Internal Revenue Code.
10–751.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Qualified child” means a dependent of a taxpayer, if the dependent:
(i) is a dependent for purposes of § 152 of the Internal Revenue Code
in effect on December 31, 2024; and
(ii) [1.] is under the age of [6] 18 years[; or
2. A. is under the age of 17 years; and
B. is a child with a disability, as defined under § 8–401 of the
Education Article].
(3) “Taxpayer” means:
(i) an individual filing an income tax return; or
(ii) a married couple filing a joint income tax return.
(b) [A] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, A taxpayer who is a
resident [and has federal adjusted gross income for the taxable year of $15,000 or less] may
claim a credit against the State income tax for each qualified child in an amount equal to:
(1) $750, IF THE QUALIFIED CHILD IS UNDER THE AGE OF 6 YEARS; OR
(2) $500, IF THE QUALIFIED CHILD IS AT LEAST 6 YEARS OLD.

SENATE BILL 859 19
(C) (1) FOR EACH TAXABLE YEAR BEGINNING AFTER DECEMBER 31,
2028, THE AMOUNTS SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION SHALL BE
INCREASED BY AN AMOUNT EQUAL TO THE PRODUCT OF MULTIPLYING THE
AMOUNTS BY THE COST–OF–LIVING ADJUSTMENT SPECIFIED IN THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE COST–OF–LIVING
ADJUSTMENT IS THE COST–OF–LIVING ADJUSTMENT WITHIN THE MEANING OF §
1(F)(3) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE FOR THE CALENDAR YEAR IN WHICH THE
TAXABLE YEAR BEGINS, AS DETERMINED BY THE COMPTROLLER, BY SUBSTITUTING
“CALENDAR YEAR 2027” FOR “CALENDAR YEAR 2016” IN § 1(F)(3)(A) OF THE
INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
(3) IF ANY INCREASE DETERMINED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION IS NOT A MULTIPLE OF $50, THE INCREASE SHALL BE ROUNDED DOWN
TO THE NEXT LOWEST MULTIPLE OF $50.
(D) THE AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF
THIS SECTION FOR A QUALIFIED CHILD SHALL BE REDUCED, BUT NOT BELOW ZERO,
BY $50 FOR EACH $1,000, OR FRACTION THEREOF, BY WHICH THE TAXPAYER’S
FEDERAL ADJUSTED GROSS INCOME EXCEEDS:
(1) $65,000 IN THE CASE OF A MARRIED COUPLE FILING A JOINT
RETURN OR A SURVIVING SPOUSE OR HEAD OF HOUSEHOLD AS DEFINED IN § 2 OF
THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE FILING AN INCOME TAX RETURN;
(2) $32,500 IN THE CASE OF A MARRIED INDIVIDUAL FILING
SEPARATELY; OR
(3) $45,000 IN THE CASE OF ANY OTHER INDIVIDUAL.
[(c)] (E) If the credit allowed under this section in any taxable year exceeds the
State income tax for that taxable year, the taxpayer may claim a refund in the amount of
the excess.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Tax – General
10–402.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.

SENATE BILL 859
(2) “COMBINED GROUP” MEANS A GROUP OF CORPORATIONS:
(I) THAT IS ENGAGED IN A UNITARY BUSINESS;
(II) IN WHICH MORE THAN 50% OF THE VOTING STOCK OF EACH
MEMBER IS DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY OWNED BY:
1. A COMMON OWNER OR COMMON OWNERS, EITHER
CORPORATE OR NONCORPORATE; OR
2. ONE OR MORE MEMBER CORPORATIONS OF THE
GROUP;
(III) THE MEMBERS OF WHICH ARE SUBJECT TO THE INCOME TAX
OR WOULD BE SUBJECT TO THE INCOME TAX IF DOING BUSINESS IN THE STATE; AND
(IV) CONSISTING OF ANY OTHER MEMBERS UNDER THE
CIRCUMSTANCES AND TO THE EXTENT PROVIDED IN REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY
THE COMPTROLLER TO PREVENT THE AVOIDANCE OF TAX OR TO REFLECT CLEARLY
THE INCOME OF ANY MEMBER OF THE COMBINED GROUP FOR ANY PERIOD.
(3) “COMBINED RETURN” MEANS A TAX RETURN FOR THE COMBINED
GROUP CONTAINING INFORMATION AS PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION OR OTHERWISE
REQUIRED BY THE COMPTROLLER.
(4) “UNITARY BUSINESS” MEANS A SINGLE ECONOMIC ENTERPRISE
THAT IS MADE EITHER OF SEPARATE PARTS OF A SINGLE BUSINESS ENTITY OR OF A
COMMONLY CONTROLLED GROUP OF BUSINESS ENTITIES THAT ARE SUFFICIENTLY
INTERDEPENDENT, INTEGRATED, AND INTERRELATED THROUGH THEIR ACTIVITIES
SO AS TO PROVIDE MUTUAL BENEFIT THAT PRODUCES A SHARING OR EXCHANGE OF
VALUE AMONG THEM AND A SIGNIFICANT FLOW OF VALUE TO THE SEPARATE PARTS.
(B) (1) THE TERM “UNITARY BUSINESS” SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO THE
BROADEST EXTENT ALLOWED UNDER THE U.S. CONSTITUTION.
(2) A BUSINESS CONDUCTED DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY BY ONE
CORPORATION IS A UNITARY BUSINESS WITH RESPECT TO THAT PORTION OF A
BUSINESS CONDUCTED BY ANOTHER CORPORATION THROUGH ITS DIRECT OR
INDIRECT INTEREST IN A PARTNERSHIP IF THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION
(A)(4) OF THIS SECTION ARE SATISFIED, INCLUDING IF THERE IS SYNERGY AND AN
EXCHANGE AND FLOW OF VALUE BETWEEN THE TWO PARTS OF THE BUSINESS AND
THE TWO CORPORATIONS ARE MEMBERS OF THE SAME COMMONLY CONTROLLED
GROUP.

SENATE BILL 859 21
(3) A BUSINESS CONDUCTED BY A PARTNERSHIP SHALL BE TREATED
AS CONDUCTED BY ITS PARTNERS, WHETHER DIRECTLY HELD OR INDIRECTLY HELD
THROUGH A SERIES OF PARTNERSHIPS, TO THE EXTENT OF THE PARTNER’S
DISTRIBUTIVE SHARE OF THE PARTNERSHIP’S INCOME, REGARDLESS OF THE
PERCENTAGE OF THE PARTNER’S OWNERSHIP INTEREST OR ITS DISTRIBUTIVE OR
ANY OTHER SHARE OF PARTNERSHIP INCOME.
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED BY AND SUBJECT TO REGULATIONS
ADOPTED BY THE COMPTROLLER, FOR ALL TAXABLE YEARS BEGINNING AFTER
DECEMBER 31, 2028, A CORPORATION ENGAGED IN A UNITARY BUSINESS SHALL
FILE A COMBINED RETURN, REPORTING AND PAYING TAX ON WORLDWIDE TAXABLE
INCOME AS A COMBINED GROUP, REFLECTING THE AGGREGATE INCOME TAX
LIABILITY OF ALL MEMBERS OF THE COMBINED GROUP THAT ARE ENGAGED IN A
UNITARY BUSINESS.
(2) THE TAXABLE INCOME OF A CORPORATION REQUIRED TO FILE
UNDER § 10–811(A)(2) OF THIS TITLE IS EQUAL TO THE COMBINED GROUP’S
MARYLAND MODIFIED INCOME AS ADJUSTED UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(3) OF THIS
SECTION.
(D) (1) THE MARYLAND MODIFIED INCOME OF THE COMBINED GROUP
EQUALS THE PRODUCT OF:
(I) THE COMBINED GROUP’S APPORTIONABLE MARYLAND
MODIFIED INCOME, AS DETERMINED UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION
AND ADJUSTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(II) THE COMBINED GROUP’S MARYLAND APPORTIONMENT
FACTOR, AS DETERMINED UNDER PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPHS (II) THROUGH (IV) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE APPORTIONABLE MARYLAND MODIFIED INCOME OF THE
COMBINED GROUP EQUALS THE SUM OF THE CORPORATION’S AND EACH MEMBER’S
MARYLAND MODIFIED INCOME.
(II) 1. SUBJECT TO SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2 OF THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH, FOR ANY MEMBER INCORPORATED IN THE UNITED STATES OR
INCLUDED IN A CONSOLIDATED FEDERAL CORPORATE INCOME TAX RETURN, THE
INCOME TO BE INCLUDED IN THE TOTAL APPORTIONABLE INCOME OF THE
COMBINED GROUP IS THE MARYLAND MODIFIED INCOME AS CALCULATED UNDER §
10–304 OF THIS TITLE.
2. THE INCOME OF EACH MEMBER SHALL BE

SENATE BILL 859
CALCULATED ON A SEPARATE RETURN BASIS AS IF THE MEMBER WERE NOT
CONSOLIDATED FOR FEDERAL INCOME TAX PURPOSES.
(III) 1. FOR ANY MEMBER NOT INCLUDED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE INCOME TO BE INCLUDED IN THE
TOTAL INCOME OF THE COMBINED GROUP IS DETERMINED AS PROVIDED UNDER
THIS SUBPARAGRAPH.
2. A PROFIT AND LOSS STATEMENT SHALL BE PREPARED
FOR EACH FOREIGN BRANCH OR CORPORATION IN THE CURRENCY IN WHICH THE
BOOKS OF ACCOUNT OF THE BRANCH OR CORPORATION ARE REGULARLY
MAINTAINED.
3. THE PROFIT AND LOSS STATEMENT SHALL BE
ADJUSTED TO CONFORM TO GENERALLY ACCEPTED ACCOUNTING PRINCIPLES AS
ADOPTED BY THE U.S. FINANCIAL ACCOUNTING STANDARDS BOARD FOR THE
PREPARATION OF THE PROFIT AND LOSS STATEMENTS, EXCEPT AS MODIFIED BY
REGULATION.
4. EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED BY REGULATION,
THE PROFIT AND LOSS STATEMENT OF EACH MEMBER OF THE COMBINED GROUP,
AND THE APPORTIONMENT FACTORS RELATED TO EACH STATEMENT, WHETHER
UNITED STATES OR FOREIGN, SHALL BE TRANSLATED INTO THE CURRENCY IN
WHICH THE PARENT COMPANY MAINTAINS ITS BOOKS AND RECORDS.
5. INCOME APPORTIONED TO THE STATE SHALL BE
EXPRESSED IN UNITED STATES DOLLARS.
(IV) IF A UNITARY BUSINESS INCLUDES INCOME FROM A
PARTNERSHIP, THE INCOME TO BE INCLUDED IN THE TOTAL INCOME OF THE
COMBINED GROUP EQUALS THE DIRECT AND INDIRECT DISTRIBUTIVE SHARE OF
THE PARTNERSHIP’S UNITARY BUSINESS INCOME ALLOCATED TO ANY MEMBER OF
THE COMBINED GROUP.
(3) THE COMBINED GROUP’S APPORTIONABLE MARYLAND MODIFIED
INCOME SHALL BE ADJUSTED TO ELIMINATE INTERCOMPANY TRANSACTIONS AS
DETERMINED UNDER THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE.
(4) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
COMBINED GROUP’S MARYLAND APPORTIONMENT FACTOR IS A FRACTION:
1. THE NUMERATOR OF WHICH IS THE SUM OF THE
CORPORATION’S AND EACH MEMBER’S MARYLAND FACTORS UNDER § 10–402 OF
THIS SUBTITLE; AND

SENATE BILL 859 23
2. THE DENOMINATOR OF WHICH IS THE SUM OF THE
CORPORATION’S AND EACH MEMBER’S FACTORS UNDER § 10–402 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(II) THE APPORTIONMENT FACTORS OF PASS–THROUGH
ENTITY MEMBERS ARE INCLUDED IN THE NUMERATOR UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)1
OF THIS PARAGRAPH AND THE DENOMINATOR UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)2 OF THIS
PARAGRAPH TO THE EXTENT OF THE CORPORATION’S DIRECT AND INDIRECT
DISTRIBUTIVE SHARE OF THAT ENTITY.
(E) (1) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT ARE
NECESSARY AND APPROPRIATE TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
(2) THE REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE COMPTROLLER SHALL BE
CONSISTENT WITH THE “PRINCIPLES FOR DETERMINING THE EXISTENCE OF A
UNITARY BUSINESS” (REG. IV.1.(B)) OF THE MODEL GENERAL ALLOCATION AND
APPORTIONMENT REGULATIONS, AS ADOPTED BY THE MULTISTATE TAX
COMMISSION.
10–811.
(A) (1) [Each member of] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED BY AND SUBJECT TO
REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE COMPTROLLER, an affiliated group of corporations
[shall file a separate income tax return] ENGAGED IN A UNITARY BUSINESS SHALL FILE
A COMBINED INCOME TAX RETURN REFLECTING THE AGGREGATE INCOME TAX
LIABILITY OF ALL THE MEMBERS OF THE AFFILIATED GROUP THAT ARE ENGAGED IN
A UNITARY BUSINESS.
(2) THE RETURN REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE THE INCOME AND APPORTIONMENT FACTORS
DETERMINED UNDER § 10–402.1(D) OF THIS TITLE, AND ANY OTHER INFORMATION
REQUIRED BY THE COMPTROLLER, FOR ALL MEMBERS OF THE COMBINED GROUP
WHEREVER LOCATED OR DOING BUSINESS.
(3) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE COMBINED RETURN SHALL BE FILED UNDER THE NAME AND
FEDERAL EMPLOYER IDENTIFICATION NUMBER OF THE PARENT CORPORATION IF
THE PARENT IS A MEMBER OF THE COMBINED GROUP.
(II) IF THERE IS NO PARENT CORPORATION OR IF THE PARENT
IS NOT A MEMBER OF THE COMBINED GROUP, THE MEMBERS OF THE COMBINED
GROUP SHALL CHOOSE A MEMBER TO FILE THE RETURN.
(III) THE FILING MEMBER UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OR (II) OF

SENATE BILL 859
THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL CONTINUE TO FILE THE COMBINED RETURN UNLESS THE
FILING MEMBER IS NO LONGER THE PARENT CORPORATION OR NO LONGER A
MEMBER OF THE COMBINED GROUP.
(4) THE RETURN SHALL BE SIGNED BY A RESPONSIBLE OFFICER OF
THE FILING MEMBER ON BEHALF OF THE COMBINED GROUP MEMBERS.
(5) MEMBERS OF THE COMBINED GROUP ARE JOINTLY AND
SEVERALLY LIABLE FOR THE TAX LIABILITY OF THE COMBINED GROUP INCLUDED
IN THE COMBINED RETURN.
(B) (1) THE COMPTROLLER MAY, BY REGULATION, REQUIRE THAT THE
COMBINED RETURN INCLUDE THE INCOME AND ASSOCIATED APPORTIONMENT
FACTORS OF ENTITIES THAT ARE NOT INCLUDED IN THE COMBINED REPORT BUT
THAT ARE MEMBERS OF A UNITARY BUSINESS IN ORDER TO REFLECT PROPER
APPORTIONMENT OF INCOME OF THE ENTIRE UNITARY BUSINESS.
(2) IF THE COMPTROLLER DETERMINES THAT THE REPORTED
INCOME OR LOSS OF A TAXPAYER ENGAGED IN A UNITARY BUSINESS WITH A MEMBER
NOT INCLUDED IN THE COMBINED GROUP REPRESENTS AN AVOIDANCE OR EVASION
OF TAX, THE COMPTROLLER MAY, ON A CASE–BY–CASE BASIS, REQUIRE THAT ALL
OR PART OF THE INCOME AND ASSOCIATED APPORTIONMENT FACTORS OF THE
MEMBER BE INCLUDED IN THE TAXPAYER’S COMBINED RETURN.
(3) THE COMPTROLLER MAY REQUIRE:
(I) THE EXCLUSION OF ONE OR MORE FACTORS, THE
INCLUSION OF ONE OR MORE ADDITIONAL FACTORS, OR THE EMPLOYMENT OF ANY
OTHER METHOD THAT WILL FAIRLY REPRESENT THE TAXPAYER’S BUSINESS IN THE
STATE; OR
(II) THE EMPLOYMENT OF ANY OTHER METHOD TO EFFECTUATE
A PROPER REFLECTION OF THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF INCOME SUBJECT TO
APPORTIONMENT AND AN EQUITABLE ALLOCATION AND APPORTIONMENT OF THE
COMBINED GROUP’S OR ITS MEMBERS’ INCOME.
(C) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS THAT ARE
NECESSARY AND APPROPRIATE TO CARRY OUT THIS SECTION.
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, for a taxable year beginning
after December 31, 2026, but before January 1, 2028, notwithstanding §§ 13–602 and
13–702 of the Tax – General Article, the Comptroller shall assess interest and penalties
under §§ 13–602 and 13–702 of the Tax – General Article if a corporation pays estimated
income tax for the taxable year in an amount less than 90% of the tax required to be shown

SENATE BILL 859 25
on the corporation’s income tax return for the taxable year.
SECTION 8. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall be
applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024.
SECTION 9. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 3 of this Act shall take
effect July 1, 2026.
SECTION 10. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 4 of this Act shall
take effect July 1, 2027, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2026.
SECTION 11. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 5 of this Act shall
take effect July 1, 2028, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2027.
SECTION 12. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 6 of this Act shall
take effect July 1, 2028, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2028.
SECTION 13. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in
Sections 9 through 12 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2025.